Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB1168.
people of the state of michigan enact: 1 2 3 CHAPTER XVII Sec. 16t. This chapter applies to the following felonies enumerated in chapter 750 of the Michigan Compiled Laws: 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 M.C.L. Category Class Description Stat Max 750.409b Pub ord F Knowing possession of ransomware with intent to use without authorization 3 750.410a Person G Conspiracy to commit a person to state hospital unjustly 4 750.410d(1)(a) Pub ord D False report of crime with the intent to cause law enforcement response 10 750.410d(1)(b) Pub ord D False report of crime with the intent to cause law enforcement response resulting in property damage 12 750.410d(1)(c) Person D False report of crime with the intent to cause law enforcement response resulting in physical injury 15 750.410d(1)(d) Person C False report of crime with the intent to cause law enforcement response resulting in serious impairment of body function 20 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 750.411a(1)(b) Pub ord F False report of a felony 4 750.411a(1)(c) Person E False report of crime resulting in physical injury 5 750.411a(1)(d) Person D False report of crime resulting in serious impairment of body function 10 750.411a(1)(e) Person C False report of crime resulting in death 15 750.411a(3)(a) Pub ord F Threat or false report of an explosive or harmful device, substance, or material 4 750.411a(3)(b) Pub ord D Threat or false report of an explosive or harmful device, substance, or material â subsequent offense 10 750.411a(4)(b) Person E False report of medical or other emergency resulting in physical injury 5 750.411a(4)(c) Person D False report of medical or other emergency resulting in serious impairment of body function 10 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 750.411a(4)(d) Person C False report of medical or other emergency resulting in death 15 750.411b Pub trst G Excess fees to members of legislature 4 750.411h(2)(b) Person E Stalking of a minor 5 750.411i(3)(a) Person E Aggravated stalking 5 750.411i(3)(b) Person D Aggravated stalking of a minor 10 750.411l Pub ord H Fourth degree money laundering 2 750.411m Pub ord E Third degree money laundering 5 750.411n Pub ord D Second degree money laundering 10 750.411o Pub ord B First degree money laundering 20 750.411p(2)(a) Property B Money laundering of proceeds from controlled substance offense involving $10,000 or more 20 750.411p(2)(b) Property D Money laundering of proceeds from controlled substance offense or other proceeds involving $10,000 or more 10 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 750.411p(2)(c) Property E Money laundering â transactions involving represented proceeds 5 750.411s(2)(a) Person G Unlawful posting of message 2 750.411s(2)(b) Person E Unlawful posting of message with aggravating circumstances 5 750.411t(2)(b) Person E Hazing resulting in serious impairment of body function 5 750.411t(2)(c) Person C Hazing resulting in death 15 750.411u Pub ord B Gang membership felonies 20 750.411v(1) Person E Gang recruitment 5 750.411v(2) Person B Retaliation for withdrawal from gang 20 750.411w Pub ord E Selling or possessing automated sales suppression device or zapper, phantom-ware, or skimming device 5 750.411x(4) Person E Cyberbullying causing serious injury 5 750.411x(5) Person D Cyberbullying causing death 10 Enacting section 1. This amendatory act takes effect 90 days 1 2 3 4 after the date it is enacted into law. Enacting section 2. This amendatory act does not take effect unless Senate Bill No. 1167 of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into law.